Utah statutes.
41-22-30.   Supervision, safety certificate, or driver license required -- Penalty.

(1)  As used in this section, "direct supervision" means oversight at a distance:

(a)  of no more than 300 feet; and

(b)  within which:

(i)  visual contact is maintained; and

(ii)  advice and assistance can be given and received.

(2)  A person may not operate and an owner may not give that person permission to operate an off-highway vehicle on any public land, trail, street, or highway of this state unless the person:

(a)  is under the direct supervision of a certified off-highway vehicle safety instructor during a scheduled safety training course;

(b) (i)  has in the person's possession the appropriate safety certificate issued or approved by the division; and

(ii)  if under 18 years of age, is under the direct supervision of a person who is at least 18 years of age if operating on a public highway that is:

(A)  open to motor vehicles; and

(B)  not exclusively reserved for off-highway vehicle use; or

(c)  has in the person's immediate possession a valid motor vehicle operator's license, as provided in Title 53, Chapter 3, Uniform Driver License Act.

(3) (a)  A person convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of an infraction and shall be fined not more than $100 per offense.

(b)  It is a defense to a charge under this section, if the person charged:

(i)  produces in court a license or an appropriate safety certificate that was:

(A)  valid at the time of the citation or arrest; and

(B)  issued to the person operating the off-highway vehicle; and

(ii)  can show that the direct supervision requirement under Subsection (2)(b) was not violated at the time of citation or arrest.

(4)  The requirements of this section do not apply to an operator of an off-highway implement of husbandry.



Amended by Chapter 79, 2008 General Session

